src-fst-morphology-affixes-propernouns.lexc.md
# Propernoun morphology for Inari Saami

TODO:
These are not in use:
ANAR DUBAI DUBAI-plc DUBAI-sur MAKI 

* **LEXICON Proper_infix** is the de Silva lexicon

* **LEXICON FirstTag**

* **LEXICON TEMPORARY**

* **LEXICON V_TEMPORARY**

* **LEXICON NIEMI**

* **LEXICON ACCRA** SM1

* **LEXICON ACCRA-ani**

* **LEXICON ACCRA-femsur**
* **LEXICON ACCRA-fem**

* **LEXICON ACCRA-malfem**

* **LEXICON ACCRA-malsur**

* **LEXICON ACCRA-mal**

* **LEXICON ACCRA-objplc**

* **LEXICON ACCRA-obj**
* **LEXICON ACCRA-org**

* **LEXICON ACCRA-A_MWE-plc**

* **LEXICON ACCRA-A-org**

* **LEXICON ACCRA-A-plc**

* **LEXICON ACCRA-A-fem**

* **LEXICON ACCRA_MWE-plc**

* **LEXICON ACCRA-plc**

* **LEXICON ACCRA-sur**

* **LEXICON JUUHA-plc** similar to JUUHA

* **LEXICON JUUHA** similar to JUUHA, stem ju

* **LEXICON LUOHTA** similar to VADDU

* **LEXICON LUOHTA-plc**   

* **LEXICON LUOHTA-mal**

* **LEXICON LUOHTA-fem**

* **LEXICON LUOHTA_PL** similar to ALGA_PL X_PUUVSAH

* **LEXICON VUONA** similar to ALGA

* **LEXICON VUONA-plc** similar to ALGA

* **LEXICON VUONA-fem** similar to ALGA

* **LEXICON KURRA-plc** similar to SOLLA

* **LEXICON KURRA** similar to SOLLA

* **LEXICON KAAVA-plc** similar to KIELA

* **LEXICON KAAVA** similar to KIELA 

* **LEXICON NJOBZA** similar to 2ALGA

* **LEXICON NJOBZA-plc** similar to 2ALGA

* **LEXICON NJOBZA-ani** similar to 2ALGA

* **LEXICON LASSA-plc** similar to FADDA

* **LEXICON LASSA**  Similar to FADDA

* **LEXICON JAVRI-plc** jävri, jeggi

* **LEXICON JAVRI-org** Ráámátservi

* **LEXICON JAVRI-mal** 

* **LEXICON JAVRI-fem** 

* **LEXICON JAVRI-ani** 

* **LEXICON JAVRI** similar to AIGI, but only Sg. Some case forms should be deleted for names? Only difference to VUONA is Ess/Par. Are they in use for names?

* **LEXICON JAAVRIH-plc**  JAVRI-plurals, e.g. Kähteejäävrih

* **LEXICON JAAVRIH**  plurals for JAVRI

* **LEXICON VAARI** to SAAMI

* **LEXICON VAARI-plc** 

* **LEXICON VAARIH-plc**  VAARI-plurals

* **LEXICON VAARIH** VAARI-plurals

* **LEXICON CIELGI** to CAACI

* **LEXICON CIELGI-plc** to CAACI

* **LEXICON NYERI** similar to KYELI

* **LEXICON NYERI-plc** similar to KYELI

* **LEXICON TUPE**  Similar to NJUNE

* **LEXICON TUPE-plc**  Similar to NJUNE

* **LEXICON TUPE-ani**  Similar to NJUNE

 *LEXICON TUPE-mal**  Similar to NJUNE

* **LEXICON VASE-plc**  Similar to VAHE

* **LEXICON VASE**

* **LEXICON POHE** nearly similar to VAHE

* **LEXICON POHE-plc** similar to VAHE

* **LEXICON MOKKE** similar to ALGE

* **LEXICON MOKKE-plc** similar to ALGE 

* **LEXICON MOKKE-sur** similar to ALGE 

* **LEXICON MOKKE-org** similar to ALGE 

* **LEXICON MOKKE-fem** similar to ALGE 

* **LEXICON MOKKE-mal** similar to ALGE 

* **LEXICON MOKKE-ani** similar to ALGE 

* **LEXICON MOKKE-obj** similar to ALGE 

* **LEXICON NIJTTO**

* **LEXICON NIJTTO-plc**  Similar to SIJVO

* **LEXICON ROTO** similar to LAJO and X_LAJO

* **LEXICON ROTO-plc** similar to LAJO and X_LAJO 

* **LEXICON LAADUH** 

* **LEXICON LAADUH-plc** Plural to LUOHTA-plc

* **LEXICON LONDON**

* **LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-obj**
* **LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-org**
* **LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-plc**

* **LEXICON LONDON-ani**
* **LEXICON LONDON-atr**
* **LEXICON LONDON-fem**

* **LEXICON LONDON-malfem**

* **LEXICON LONDON-malplc**

* **LEXICON LONDON-malsur**

* **LEXICON LONDON-mal**

* **LEXICON LONDON-obj**

* **LEXICON LONDON-orgsur**

* **LEXICON LONDON-org**

* **LEXICON LONDON-orgplc**

* **LEXICON LONDON_MWE-plc**

* **LEXICON LONDON-plc**

* **LEXICON LONDON-sur**

* **LEXICON LONDONBERN-plc**

* **LEXICON AANAAR** Goes to EEMEED

* **LEXICON AANAAR-plc**

* **LEXICON AANAAR-mal**

* **LEXICON AANAAR-fem**

LEXICON KIARUN = 3KIELES

**LEXICON LUOBAL** Similar to VEESKIR

* **LEXICON LUOBAL-plc** Similar to VEESKIR

* **LEXICON LUOBBALEH** plural forms 

* **LEXICON LUOBBALEH-plc** Plural to LUOBAL-plc

* **LEXICON LUOBBALEH-org** Plural to LUOBAL-plc

* **LEXICON LUOBBALEH-ani** Plural to LUOBAL-plc

* **LEXICON MAARIT** 

* **LEXICON MAARIT-fem similar to 3POTTAAK** 

* **LEXICON MAARIT-mal similar to 3POTTAAK** 

* **LEXICON SAVO-plc** similar to ALGA

* **LEXICON SAVO** similar to ALGA

* **LEXICON KUOLBA-plc** similar to POOVSA

* **LEXICON KUOLBA**  similar to POOVSA

* **LEXICON LYEME** 

* **LEXICON ANDARAS**  this is for loanwords without stem change, 3-syll. cons end

* **LEXICON ANDARAS-mal** similar to KUNAGAS

* **LEXICON ANDARAS-org** similar to KUNAGAS

* **LEXICON ANDARAS-plc** similar to KUNAGAS

* **LEXICON ANDARAS-obj** similar to KUNAGAS

* **LEXICON IANUDAH-plc**  Similar to 4JOTOLAH

* **LEXICON KALDEE** Similar to TAHHEE

* **LEXICON KALDEE-plc**  Similar to TAHHEE

* **LEXICON KALDEE-org**  Similar to TAHHEE
* **LEXICON KALDEE-sur**  Similar to TAHHEE

* **LEXICON KALDEE_PL-plc**  Similar to TAHHEE_PL

* **LEXICON KALDEE-mal**

* **LEXICON KALDEE-fem**

* **LEXICON KALDEE-ani**

* **LEXICON KALDEE_PL** Similar to TAHHEE

* **LEXICON SUALUI** similar to PUASUI and KUAVSUI

* **LEXICON SUALUI-plc** similar to PUASUI and KUAVSUI. 

* **LEXICON SUOLLUUH-plc** SUALUI-plc plurals 

* **LEXICON SUOLLUUH** SUALUI-plc plurals 

* *LEXICON PIRUKAAMUV-plc*

* *LEXICON PIRUKAAMUV*

**LEXICON PAALGIS** similar to KAARBIS

**LEXICON Prop_h_PL-plc**  gives %>h etc. to vowel stems

**LEXICON Prop_h_PL**  gives %>h etc. to vowel stems

* **LEXICON HANNOLA-plc**

* **LEXICON HANNOLA-sur**

* **LEXICON ERVASTI** 

* **LEXICON BISSAU-plc**

* **LEXICON ERVASTI-plcmal**

* **LEXICON ERVASTI-fem**

* **LEXICON ERVASTI-mal**

* **LEXICON ERVASTI-obj**

* **LEXICON ERVASTI-org**

* **LEXICON ERVASTI-plc**

* **LEXICON ERVASTI-sur**

* **LEXICON BERN**

* **LEXICON BERN-LOAN-obj**
* **LEXICON BERN-LOAN-org**
* **LEXICON BERN-LOAN-plc**

* **LEXICON BERN-ani**

* **LEXICON BERN-fem**

* **LEXICON BERN-mal**

* **LEXICON BERN-objsur**
* **LEXICON BERN-obj**
* **LEXICON BERN-orgsur**
* **LEXICON BERN-org**

* **LEXICON BERN_MWE-plc**

* **LEXICON BERN-plc**

* **LEXICON BERN-surmal**
* **LEXICON BERN-sur**

* **LEXICON OY-plc** ad hoc 

* **LEXICON OY-sur** ad hoc 

* **LEXICON OY-fem** ad hoc 

* **LEXICON C-FI-NEN**

* **LEXICON C-FI-NEN-plc**

* **LEXICON C-FI-NEN-sur**

* **LEXICON C-FI-NEN-org**

* **LEXICON DUBAI**

* **LEXICON DUBAI-mal**

* **LEXICON DUBAI-fem**

* **LEXICON DUBAI-sur**

* **LEXICON DUBAI-obj**

* **LEXICON DUBAI_MWE-plc**

* **LEXICON DUBAI-plc**

* **LEXICON DUBAI-org**

* **LEXICON GATA-plc**

* **LEXICON JOKULL-plc**

* **LEXICON MAKI-plc**

* **LEXICON MAKI-sur**

* **LEXICON PIPPI-LOAN-plc**

* **LEXICON PIPPI-ani**
* **LEXICON PIPPI-femsur**

* **LEXICON PIPPI-fem**

* **LEXICON PIPPI-malfem**

* **LEXICON PIPPI-mal**

* **LEXICON PIPPI-obj**
* **LEXICON PIPPI-org**
* **LEXICON PIPPI_MWE-plc**

* **LEXICON PIPPI-plc**

* **LEXICON PIPPI-sur**

* **LEXICON RONDANE-LOAN**

* **LEXICON RONDANE-SG-LOAN**

* **LEXICON RONDANE-SG-plc**

* **LEXICON RONDANE-fem**

* **LEXICON RONDANE-mal**

* **LEXICON RONDANE-obj**
* **LEXICON RONDANE-org**
* **LEXICON RONDANE-plc**

* **LEXICON RONDANE-sur**

* **LEXICON RONDANE**

| --- | --- | --- 

* **LEXICON UAIVAS**   similar to KUAVDAS

* **LEXICON UAIVAS-plc** similar to KUAVDAS. 

* **LEXICON SUANJU** similar to LAAVU

* **LEXICON SUANJU-plc** similar to LAAVU

* **LEXICON SUANJU-ani** similar to LAAVU

* **LEXICON SUANJU-fem** similar to LAAVU

* **LEXICON EENA-plc** no stem in stems/smn-propernouns.le≈c

* **LEXICON EENNAM-plc** similar to EEMEED

* **LEXICON EENNAM-mal** similar to EEMEED

* **LEXICON EENNAM** similar to EEMEED

* **LEXICON ENAMEH-plc** similar to EEMEED

* **LEXICON ENAMEH**  plurals for EEMEED

* **LEXICON MAADIJ**  Similar to AARRAN

* **LEXICON MAADIJ-plc**  Similar to AARRAN

* **LEXICON CUAJA** similar to TAALU2

* **LEXICON CUAJA-plc** similar to TAALU2

* **LEXICON CUAJA-fem** XXX check this

* **LEXICON JAAVRAS-plc**  

* **LEXICON JAAVRAS-mal**  

* **LEXICON JAAVRAS**  

**LEXICON SUOLLUS-plc** 

**LEXICON SUOLLUS** 

* **LEXICON JUUVAS-plc** 

* **LEXICON VUONAS-plc** 

* **LEXICON VUONAS-ani**

* **LEXICON VUONAS-mal**

* **LEXICON VUONAS**  

* **LEXICON VUONIIH-plc** Plural to VUONAS-plc

* **LEXICON VUONIIH** plural forms 

* **LEXICON VAARAAS-plc**  

* **LEXICON VAARAAS**  vá^RVrá

* **LEXICON LAADUS**  

* **LEXICON LAADUS-plc** 

* **LEXICON LADDUUH**  

* **LEXICON LADDUUH-plc**  Similar to SPALVAAS plural

* **LEXICON AALAAS-plc**  Similar to ALGAAS

* **LEXICON AALAAS** 

* **LEXICON SIALGAS-plc**  Similar to KUAVDAS

* **LEXICON SIALGAS-mal**  Similar to KUAVDAS

* **LEXICON SIALGAS**  

* **LEXICON SME_NAMES-org** 

* **LEXICON SME_NAMES-mal** 

* **LEXICON SME_NAMES-fem**

* **LEXICON SME_NAMES-sur**

* **LEXICON SME_NAMES-plc**

* **LEXICON SME_NAMES_PERS** Attr to North Saami person names

* **LEXICON SME_NAMES** temp. only Sg+Nom and Cmp to North Saami names

* **LEXICON PERSNAME-NOMCMP** e.g. Anttikandâ,  

* **LEXICON PERSNAME-GENCMP** e.g. , Aanti-kyevtis

* **LEXICON flagK** 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-smn/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc)</small>
